Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Chapter 03. Environmental Conservation.

Administrative Code. —

For environmental conservation, see 18 AAC.

For air quality control, see 18 AAC 50.

For solid waste management, see 18 AAC 60.

For hazardous waste, see 18 AAC 62.

For siting of hazardous waste management facilities, see 18 AAC 63.

Collateral references. —

Amount and characteristics of wastes as equitable factors in allocation of response costs pursuant to § 113(f)(1) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA), 42 U.S.C.A. § 9613(f)(1): multiple waste streams. 162 ALR Fed. 371.

Actions brought under Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (Clean Water Act) (33 U.S.C.A. §§ 1251 et seq.) — Supreme Court cases. 163 ALR Fed. 531.